Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2471.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 483A.24, subsection 17, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 17. Upon payment of a fee established by rules adopted pursuant to section 483A.1 of five dollars, and any processing fee, for a lifetime fur harvester license, the department shall issue a lifetime fur harvester license to a resident of Iowa who has served in the armed forces of the United States on federal active duty and who was disabled during that veteranâs military service. The department shall prepare an application to be used by a person requesting a lifetime fur harvester license under this subsection . The department of veterans affairs shall assist the department in verifying the status or Senate File 2471, p. 2 claims of applicants under this subsection . As used in this subsection , âdisabledâ means entitled to a service connected rating under 38 U.S.C. ch. 11. ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House I hereby certify that this bill originated in the Senate and is known as Senate File 2471, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ W. CHARLES SMITHSON Secretary of the Senate Approved _______________, 2026 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor